en: Polishers & Buffers
xx: Polishers & Buffers
cs: Leštiče a čističe
da: Polerværktøjer og polerskiver
de: Schleifer & Poliermaschinen
es: Pulidoras
fr: Polisseuses et lustreuses
it: Lucidatrici e pulitrici
ja: ポリッシャー・バッファー
nl: Poets- en polijstmachines
no: Polermaskiner
pl: Polerki
pt: Polidores
ru: Инструменты для шлифовки и полировки
sv: Poleringsverktyg
tr: Cilalayıcılar ve Perdahlayıcılar

en: Post Hole Diggers
xx: Post Hole Diggers
cs: Zahradní vrtáky
da: Stolpebor
de: Lochschaufeln
es: Ahoyadoras
fr: Bêches tarières
it: Foratrici per pali
ja: 穴掘り機・複式ショベル
nl: Grondboren
no: Stolpehullgravere
pl: Świdry ziemne
pt: Escavadeiras para postes
ru: Буры для установки столбов
sv: Stolphålsgrävare
tr: Direk Çukuru Kazıcılar

en: Pry Bars
xx: Pry Bars
cs: Páčidla
da: Brækjern
de: Brecheisen
es: Pies de cabra
fr: Barres de levier
it: Palanchini
ja: バール
nl: Koevoeten
no: Brekkjern
pl: Łomy stalowe
pt: Pés-de-cabra
ru: Монтировки
sv: Kofötter
tr: Manivelalar

en: Punches & Awls
xx: Punches & Awls
cs: Děrovačky a šídla
da: Stansemaskiner og syle
de: Locheisen & Ahlen
es: Perforadoras y punzones
fr: Poinçons et alènes
it: Punzoni e punteruoli
ja: パンチ・千枚通し
nl: Priemen en ponsen
no: Hulljern og syler
pl: Dziurkacze i przebijaki
pt: Furadores
ru: Шила и пробойники
sv: Stansapparater och sylar
tr: Delgiler ve Bizler

en: Putty Knives & Scrapers
xx: Putty Knives & Scrapers
cs: Špachtle a škrabky
da: Spatler og skrabejern
de: Kittmesser & -spachtel
es: Raspadores y espátulas
fr: Spatules et grattoirs
it: Spatole e raschietti per stucco
ja: スクレイパー・へら
nl: Plamuurmessen en -schapers
no: Sparkelspader og skrapere
pl: Szpachle i skrobaki
pt: Espátulas e raspadores
ru: Штапели и скребки
sv: Färgskrapor och spackelknivar
tr: Ispatulalar ve Raspalar

en: Reamers
xx: Reamers
cs: Výstružníky
da: Rømmejern
de: Reibahlen
es: Escariadores
fr: Alésoirs
it: Alesatori
ja: リーマー
nl: Ruimers
no: Hullfreser
pl: Rozwiertaki
pt: Mandris
ru: Расширители
sv: Brotschar
tr: Raybalar

en: Riveting Tools
xx: Riveting Tools
cs: Nástroje na nýtování
da: Nitteværktøjer
de: Nietwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas de remachado
fr: Outils de rivetage
it: Rivettatrici
ja: リベット工具
nl: Klinkgereedschappen
no: Nagleverktøy
pl: Narzędzia do nitowania
pt: Ferramentas de rebites
ru: Клепальные инструменты
sv: Nitverktyg
tr: Perçinleme Aletleri

en: Rivet Guns
xx: Rivet Guns
cs: Nýtovací pistole
da: Nittepistoler
de: Nietpistolen
es: Pistolas de remachado
fr: Pistolets à riveter
it: Rivettatrici pneumatiche
ja: リベットガン
nl: Klinknagelpistolen
no: Naglepistoler
pl: Młotki nitownicze
pt: Pistolas de rebites
ru: Клепальные молотки
sv: Nitpistoler
tr: Perçin Tabancaları

en: Rivet Pliers
xx: Rivet Pliers
cs: Nýtovací kleště
da: Nittetænger
de: Nietzangen
es: Tenazas de remachado
fr: Pinces à riveter
it: Rivettatrici manuali
ja: リベットプライヤー
nl: Klinknageltangen
no: Nagletenger
pl: Szczypce do nitów
pt: Alicates de rebites
ru: Клепальные щипцы
sv: Nittänger
tr: Perçin Kerpetenleri

en: Routing Tools
xx: Routing Tools
cs: Frézky
da: Fræseværktøjer
de: Oberfräsen
es: Rebajadoras
fr: Défonceuses
it: Fresatrici verticali
ja: ルーター (工具)
nl: Bovenfrees
no: Freseverktøy
pl: Narzędzia do frezowania pionowego
pt: Tupias
ru: Инструменты для фрезеровки
sv: Fräsverktyg
tr: Yönlendirme Aletleri

en: Sanders
xx: Sanders
cs: Rovinné brusky
da: Sandpapirmaskiner
de: Schwingschleifer
es: Lijadoras
fr: Ponceuses, Ponceuse électrique
it: Smerigliatrici
ja: サンダー
nl: Schuurmachines
no: Pussemaskiner
pl: Piaszczarki
pt: Lixadeiras
ru: Шлифовальные станки
sv: Slipmaskiner
tr: Zımpara Makineleri

en: Sanding Blocks
xx: Sanding Blocks
cs: Brusné bloky
da: Pudseklodser
de: Schleifblöcke
es: Bloques de lija
fr: Blocs de ponçage
it: Tamponi per carteggiatura
ja: サンディングブロック
nl: Schuurblokken
no: Pusseklosser
pl: Klocki do szlifowania
pt: Suportes para lixas
ru: Шлифовальные колодки
sv: Block för sandpapper
tr: Zımpara Blokları

en: Saw Horses
xx: Saw Horses
cs: Kozy na řezání
da: Savbukke
de: Sägeböcke
es: Caballetes de aserrar
fr: Chevalet de sciage
it: Cavalletti (per legna)
ja: ソーホース
nl: Zaagbokken
no: Sagbukker
pl: Koziołki do cięcia drewna
pt: Cavaletes para serrar madeira
ru: Козлы для пилки дров
sv: Sågbockar
tr: Testere Tezgahları

en: Saws
xx: Saws
cs: Pily
da: Save
de: Sägen
es: Sierras
fr: Scies, Scie (non électrique), Scie à bûches thermique
it: Seghe
ja: のこぎり
nl: Zagen
no: Sager
pl: Piły
pt: Serras
ru: Пилы
sv: Sågar
tr: Testereler

en: Hacksaws, Hacksaw
de: Bügelsägen
fi: Rautasaha
fr: Scie à archet
nb: Baufil
nl: Ijzerzaag
pl: Piła kabłąkowa
sv: Bågfilar

en: Band Saws
xx: Band Saws
cs: Pásové pily
da: Båndsave
de: Bandsägen
es: Sierras de cinta
fr: Scies à ruban
it: Seghe nastro
ja: バンドソー
nl: Bandzaagmachines
no: Båndsager
pl: Piły taśmowe
pt: Serras de fita
ru: Ленточные пилы
sv: Bandsågar
tr: Şerit Testereler

en: Cut-Off Saws
xx: Cut-Off Saws
cs: Rozbrušovací pily
da: Rundsave
de: Trennsägen
es: Sierras cortadas
fr: Ébouteuses
it: Seghe circolari per metalli
ja: カットオフソー
nl: Slijpschijven
no: Kappsager
pl: Piły do metali
pt: Serras de corte
ru: Концерезные пилы
sv: Cirkelsågar
tr: Doğrama Testereleri

en: Hand Saws
xx: Hand Saws
cs: Ruční pily
da: Fukssvanse
de: Handsägen
es: Serruchos
fr: Scies à main
it: Seghetti a lama libera
ja: 手引きのこぎり
nl: Handzagen
no: Håndsager
pl: Piły ręczne
pt: Serras manuais
ru: Ручные пилы
sv: Fogsvansar
tr: El Testereleri

en: Handheld Circular Saws
xx: Handheld Circular Saws
cs: Ruční kotoučové pily
da: Håndholdte
de: Handkreissägen
es: Sierras circulares manuales
fr: Scies circulaires manuelles, Scie circulaire
it: Seghe circolari portatili
ja: 電動丸のこ
nl: Cirkelzagen
no: Håndholdte sirkelsager
pl: Przenośne piły tarczowe
pt: Serras circulares manuais
ru: Ручные циркулярные пилы
sv: Handcirkelsågar
tr: Dairesel El Testereleri

en: Jigsaws
xx: Jigsaws
cs: Přímočaré pily
da: Dekupørsave
de: Stichsägen
es: Sierras de vaivén
fr: Scies sauteuses, Scie sauteuse
ja: ジグソー
nl: Decoupeerzagen
no: Løvsager
pl: Wyrzynarki
pt: Serras tico-tico
ru: Лобзики
sv: Figursågar
tr: Dekupaj Testereleri